Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1509
Highway superintendent; interest in public contracts prohibited; reports to county board; neglect of duty; removal from office.

The county highway superintendent shall not be interested directly or indirectly in any contract with the county, and shall render at any time an accounting of his acts and doings to the county board when requested by it so to do; and he may be removed from office by such board at any time upon failure to perform the duties of his office.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. II, § 9, p. 516.